apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="সুদ__n">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>েত</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="loc" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোর</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="hu" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরঘর</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরঘরের</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরক</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরসব</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরদের</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোররা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরঘরেক</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরটাক</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="পয়সা__n">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>গুলা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>গুলার</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="gen" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সুদ__n">
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>েত</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="loc" />
            <s n="nn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nt" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোর</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="nom" />
            <s n="hu" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="mf" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরঘর</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরঘরের</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরক</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরসব</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরদের</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="gen" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোররা</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরঘরেক</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="obj" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e alt="Barendri">
        <p>
          <l>খোরটাক</l>
          <r>
            <s n="np" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="ant" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="obj" />
            <s n="def" />
          </r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <e lm="সুদ">
       <i>সুদ</i>
       <par n="সুদ__n" />
     </e>
     <e lm="পয়সা">
       <i>পয়সা</i>
       <par n="পয়সা__n" />
     </e>
